Washington statutes.
RCW 43.300.050

Exempt positions.

The director shall appoint such deputy directors, assistant directors, and up to seven special assistants as may be needed to administer the department. These employees are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW.

[ 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 6.]